src/fastspell_dictionaries/bho.dic
अंग/3,15,145
अंचल/254
करा/15,21,38,52,59,220
कहा/6,11,12,23,25,39,46,61,106
किस/1,49,81,185,243
कुकरे/229
कोर/3,18,159,224
क्षेत्र/3,4,16,63,101,121,130,177
खुस/1,239
गिना/8,53,106
गोधन/3,154
चौकीदार/5,46
जाइ/7,8,25,51,62,66,102
जाय/2,8,11,31,33,66,179
जिय/2,3,9,19,48,60,123
जिले/139
जिस/2,21,24,49,81,116,125,208
जीत/1,2,3,7,8,11,14,26,31,36,140,161
जें/173
जेकर/1,2,3,251
जेठ/2,3,167
जेह/4,10,42,43,125
जोग/1,3,18,50,88,252
ढरक/68
तब्बो/101
तरी/49
ताल/1,2,3,47,83,242
तोहर/2,3,86,97,119
दण्ड/59
दरिदर/227
दर्ज/1,3,4,214
दिआ/52
दिन/2,4,16,42,168,186,210
दिस/3,65,195
दिहल/1,2,3,4,19,20,26,34,127
दुनिया/6,25,129,210
दुलार/1,26,107
देइ/8,25,58,74,102,197
देख/1,2,3,4,7,8,10,11,14,15,20,21,22,24,26,31,32,33,34,42,46,48,57,58,88,107,108,117,119,162,165,168,190,211,222,228,246,249
देखल/32,58,121,122,124
देत/1,2,3,32,72
देन/1,2,3,57
देश/1,4,5,16,66,131
नगर/1,3,4,18
नहा/15,21,39,61,91
नाग/161,203,244
नाच/1,2,8,117
नाह/32,76
निकर/8,246
निकल/1,2,3,7,8,10,15,19,21,31,33,36,48,77,107,211
निर्देश/5,44,83
नेत/3,10,131,147,158
नौकर/1,167
पंक्ति/132
पकवल/1,194
पक्ष/1,77,164
पता/7,62
पत्रकार/4,244
परात/2,113
पहुंच/3,109
पाँच/1,9,22
पात/1,2,3,12,144,158
पाव/2,3,7,8,12,19,20,31,37,118,144,210
पिआ/22,23
पिया/214,235
पिस/36,96,131,142
पीस/1,7,33
पुछलकै/70
पुत्र/1
पुर/1,3,102
पुलिस/18,38,99,129
पूछ/2,7,8,11,14,15,58,183,223,232
पूर्ण/13,193
पेट/1,2,5,23,26,35,50,84
प्रकाश/4,5,44,155
प्रदेश/16,35
प्रभाव/1,44,177
प्रारंभ/40
प्रेम/1,5,83
फायर/120
फिल्म/1,64,191
फूटे/11,67,225
बईठ/2,5,7,19,81
बटाए/25
बता/37,115
बतिया/8,23,52,59
बतियावेली/187
बदल/1,2,3,7,8,10,11,13,15,21,68,85,119
बनरिन/205
बनाए/4,7,25,175,206
बनि/38
बरस/2,3,37,118,255
बहार/7,174
बहिर/69
बहु/7,11,48,153
बहुत/9,100
बाँध/1,2,10,21,42
बाज/3,4,7,28,33,34,50
बाट/3,20,37,77,119
बात/1,2,4,10,20,208
बाद/2,5,7,9,12,35,55,155
बाब/3,147,238
बार/1,2,3,7,10,32,41,110,112,222,246
बिअल/1,87
बिन/3,18,28,43,115,248
बियाह/5,22
बीबी/126
बुझ/3,10,57,68,110,111,117,142,148,166,191,202
बुराई/92
बूझ/1,2,36,68,110,115
बें/8,59,75,181
बेकत/10,152
बेद/1,54
बेर/3,157
बैस/3,7,10,11
बोल/1,2,3,7,8,9,10,13,14,15,19,20,21,31,33,48,68,85,88,107,119,148,164,168,190,191,232,249
भकुआ/61
भभूटा/30
भरे/6,11,36,67
भाग/1,2,8,10,16,55,59,162
भार/1,5,8,115
भारत/9,63,76,116
भुल/3,111
भूभाग/101
भेल/1,3,72,84,123,160,231
भोजपुर/1,18,47,76,83,242
भ्रमण/245
मंगल/2,130,134
मजबूत/1,3,152
मणि/65
मना/11,17,21,23,48,52,62,150,211
मलि/64
मस्त/1,5,146
महा/4,105,178,180,218
माँग/2,8,15
माछ/1,3,156
माथ/2,3,5,10,239
मान/1,2,3,5,7,8,9,10,13,19,21,26,28,31,48,53,55,102,108,117,118,212,234,236
मार/1,2,3,7,9,15,19,21,24,31,32,37,58,102,141,236
मिल/1,2,3,4,7,8,9,10,11,13,14,21,24,31,37,42,44,48,88,89,109,115,146,148,165,201
मुझ/2,116,125
मेहरारू/131
मैथिल/163
मोट/3,27,35,226
मौजूद/3,135
याद/4,53
यूपी/39
रंग/2,3,4,5,10,143
रंगमंच/5,63
रखे/6,95
रजनी/128
रहइ/25,99
रहन/1,2,3,32,140,233
रहल/1,2,3,4,9,20,32,34,84,122,137,231
रहि/4,6,8,11,24,41,58,79,91,112,197,204,222
रहू/23
राख/2,7,20,34
राज/3,4,22,55,133,147,161,181,186,219,249
राजपूत/109
राज्य/4,16
राम/2,3,26,29,218
राव/104
राष्ट्र/4,63,199,213
राह/1,2,8,238
रेस/176
रोक/2,3,7,8,10,21,26,32,142
रोग/1,16,18
रोवस/169
लउक/2,3,7,8,31,118,234
लगबे/71
लड़ाई/171
लड़िका/189
लाल/2,26,29,146,198
लिख/1,2,3,7,9,14,15,22,24,26,32,46,111,117,142,232
लिहे/4,6,19
लें/80
लेल/2,3,4,5,19,20,84
लोग/2,4,9,16,22,77,131,241
लोगन/10,230
लौट/1,8,11,32,42,156,183
वस्तु/8,93,221
विचार/74
विद्या/213
विद्रोह/1,5,164
वेश/228
व्यक्त/10,47,246
व्यापार/1,40,47,77
शब्द/4,5,16,49,219
शान/185
शासन/73
शास्त्र/5,63,192
संस्करण/4,98
संस्था/4,93
सके/6,11,14,67,89
सता/23,48,52,94
सदस्य/5,13,16
सपा/17,75
सबक/1,2,3,9,12,37,60
समझ/1,2,3,7,9,13,15,21,42,68,85,109,114,140,165,195
समझाव/19
समर्थ/4,5,155
समाज/5,40,199
समुदाय/4,49
सरल/13
सर्व/12,141
सर्वसक्ति/209
सर्वेक्षण/208
साझा/56
साथ/1,2,35,47,62,119,124,164
सिया/12,29,126
सीमा/15,78,93
सुख/1,2,7,11,14,21,166
सुन/1,2,3,7,8,10,12,14,15,24,27,31,32,33,48,57,58,117,162,168,190,195
सुर/43,161,170
सूचक/217
सोच/2,8,11,14,15,21,31,32,46,202
सोम/3,82,130
सोमार/1,9,134
सोहर/8,90,250
स्कूल/4,16,120
स्वतंत्र/3,13,256
स्वामी/29
हटा/17,21,39
हमला/173
हमही/6,237
हरा/4,37,176
हार/1,2,3,7,9,10,11,13,15,31,140,159
होइ/5,7,8,24,25,51,58,74,79,91,136,137
होई/8,58,79,149
होम/28
